Hawaii statutes.
§444-2 Exemptions. This chapter shall
not apply to:

(1) Officers and employees of the United States, the
State, or any county while in the performance of their governmental duties;

(2) Any person acting as a receiver, trustee in
bankruptcy, personal representative, or any other person acting under any order
or authorization of any court;

(3) A person who sells or installs any finished
products, materials, or articles of merchandise that are not actually
fabricated into and do not become a permanent fixed part of the structure, or
to the construction, alteration, improvement, or repair of personal property;

(4) Any project or operation for which the aggregate
contract price for labor, materials, taxes, and all other items is not more
than $1,000. This exemption shall not apply in any case where a building
permit is required regardless of the aggregate contract price, nor where the
undertaking is only a part of a larger or major project or operation, whether
undertaken by the same or a different contractor or in which a division of the
project or operation is made in contracts of amounts not more than $1,000 for
the purpose of evading this chapter or otherwise;

(5) A registered architect or professional engineer
acting solely in the person's professional capacity;

(6) Any person who engages in the activities
regulated in this chapter as an employee with wages as the person's sole
compensation;

(7) Owner-builders exempted under section 444-2.5;

(8) Any joint venture if all members thereof hold
licenses issued under this chapter;

(9) Any project or operation where it is determined
by the board that less than ten persons are qualified to perform the work in
question and that the work does not pose a potential danger to public health,
safety, and welfare; or

(10) Any public works project that requires additional
qualifications beyond those established by the licensing law and which is
deemed necessary and in the public interest by the contracting agency. [L 1957,
c 305, §1(s 2); Supp, §166A-2; HRS §444-2; am L 1969, c 163, §1; am L 1974, c
112, §1(3); am L 1975, c 128, §1; am L 1976, c 200, pt of §1; am L 1985, c 215,
§1; gen ch 1985; am L 1986, c 182, §1; am L 1989, c 142, §2; am L 1992, c 258,
§1 and c 269, §2; am L 1996, c 172, §3; am L 2010, c 44, §3]

Case Notes

Defendant's motion to dismiss denied; because it was feasible
that plaintiff's actions constituted that of a "professional engineer
acting solely in [its] professional capacity", it was not apparent that
[this chapter] barred plaintiff from bringing lawsuit. 216 F. Supp. 2d 1133
(2001).

Promise by defendant to pay plaintiff for work performed and
moneys expended established an employment relationship and took matter outside
of chapter under paragraph (7). 58 H. 257, 567 P.2d 824 (1977).

While a member of the public who violates the owner-builder
exemption under paragraph (7) (1993) by selling or leasing the subject property
within one year of completion is subject to the sanctions imposed under
paragraph (7), that party is not precluded from enforcing the underlying
contract with an unlicensed contractor. 92 H. 117 (App.), 987 P.2d 1015 (1999).

Pursuant to paragraph (7), homeowners did not have the
benefit of, and, as to homeowners, contractor was not obligated to comply with,
the disclosure provisions of §444-25.5. 109 H. 96 (App.), 123 P.3d 691 (2005).

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next